Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-310
Rules and regulations; real and personal property; prohibited acts; violation; penalty.

(1) The commission may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations relating to the protection, use, or removal of any public real or personal property on any area under its ownership or control and may regulate or prohibit the construction or installation of any privately owned structure on such area. The commission may close all or any portion of any area under its ownership or control to any form of public use or access with the erection of proper signs, without the enactment of formal written regulations. Any person who, without the permission of the commission, constructs or installs any privately owned structure or who uses or removes any public real or personal property, on any area under the ownership or control of the commission, or who enters or remains upon all or any portion of any area under the ownership or control of the commission, where proper signs or public notices prohibiting the same have been erected or displayed, shall be guilty of a Class V misdemeanor.

(2) Any person who abandons any motor vehicle, trailer, or other conveyance in any area under the ownership or control of the commission shall be guilty of a Class V misdemeanor.

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 68.